Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1820
Metropolitan transit authority; financial statement; publication; filing.

As soon after the end of each fiscal year as may be expedient, the board shall cause to be prepared and printed a complete and detailed report and financial statement of its operations and of its assets and liabilities. A reasonably sufficient number of copies of such report shall be printed for distribution to persons interested, upon request, eight copies shall be filed with the Nebraska Publications Clearinghouse, and a copy thereof shall be mailed to the mayor and members of the city council and the governing board of any county in which such city is located, adjacent county, or city or village located within such counties served by the authority, and filed with the clerk of such county, city, or village.

Laws 1957, c. 23, § 20, p. 172;

Laws 1972, LB 1275, § 16;

Laws 1972, LB 1284, § 12;

Laws 2003, LB 720, § 5.